District of Columbia statutes.
42-2031

Authority vested in Board of Commissioners unaffected; delegation of functions.

Nothing in this subchapter or in any amendments made by this subchapter shall be construed so as to affect the authority vested in the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952 (66 Stat. 824). The performance of any function vested by this subchapter in the Board of Commissioners or in any office or agency under the jurisdiction and control of said Board of Commissioners may be delegated by said Board of Commissioners in accordance with § 3 of such plan.

History

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 462, Pub. L. 88-218, § 31

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1732.
1973 Ed., § 5-931.

Editor's Notes

Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively.